District of Columbia statutes.
47-895.06

Application of Special Assessment.

The Chief Financial Officer shall deposit the special assessment revenues collected under this subchapter in the Southwest Waterfront Fund.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-252, § 301(b), 55 DCR 9251
This section is referenced in § 47-895.03.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 301(b) of Energy Efficiency Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-324, March 1, 2010, 57 DCR 1851).